North Dakota, session 69, SB2249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - HISTORICAL HEALTH CARE MANDATES.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying historical
health care mandates. The study must include:
a. An analysis of current health care mandates, including when they were enacted, the
purpose, effectiveness, and present applicability;
b. A history of health care mandates and step therapy protocol; and
c. Input from the department of health and human services, the insurance department, the
public employees retirement system, insurance providers and other stakeholders.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2249 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2249.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 9 Absent 10
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State